v1.1/old/guesser.lexc
LEXICON VerbPostbase4
0:0  VerbMoodInfl;
0:0  AssignValenceVerbEte;
-~sf–ghhalek[how.V][V→XCLM]:~sf–ghhalek  EncliticOrEnd;
-–kestaamaan:–kestaamaan                 #; ! in the time of

-aghaghte[V→V]:aghaghte                       VerbPostbase5; ! to immediately V; to briefly V; to quickly V; to suddenly V
-~f(a)ghesnagh[V→V]:~f(a)ghesnagh             VerbPostbase5; ! to just V; to V just now; to only V (and perhaps in vain)
-–qiinagh[V→V]:–qiinagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to just V; to V just now; to only V (and perhaps in vain)
-~aghtagh[V→V]:~aghtagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V repeatedly with back and forth movement
-~aghte[V→V]:~aghte                           VerbPostbase5; ! to suddenly V
-~aatagh[V→V]:~aatagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V finally or repeatedly and persistently, several times
-~(at)aghagh[V→V]:~(at)aghagh                 VerbPostbase5; ! to be V-er; to V more; to be more V
-(pete)fte[V→V]:(pete)fte                     VerbPostbase5; ! to evidently V or have V-ed; to turn out to (be) V
-~(g)aqe[V→V]:~(g)aqe                         VerbPostbase5; ! to be currently V-ing; to V now and then; to always V
-–ghllag[V→V]:–ghllag                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V or be Vin a big way; to V for a long time
-–ghllagu[V→V]:–ghllagu                       VerbPostbase5; ! to be very V; to be busy V-ing
-@₁–ghpagte[V→V]:@₁–ghpagte                   VerbPostbase5; ! to V rapidly, suddenly or in a major way
-–ghraag[V→V]:–ghraag                         VerbPostbase5; ! to do some V-ing; to gradually V; to get V-er; to be somewhat V
-iiraagh[V→V]:iiraagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to play at V-ing; to keep on V-ing
-––iqe[V→V]:––iqe                             VerbPostbase5; ! to have trouble with one's V-ing over a period of time
-@₁~%:(i/u)ma[V→V]:@₁~%:(i/u)ma               VerbPostbase5; ! to have V-ed or been V-ed; to be in a state of having V-ed or been V-ed; to evidently have V-ed or been V-ed
-@₁~%:(i/u)mafte[V→V]:@₁~%:(i/u)mafte         VerbPostbase5; ! how much subject evidently has V-ed!
-@₁~%:(i/u)magh*[V→V]:@₁~%:(i/u)magh*         QuantQualPostbase; ! while V-ing
-@₁~%:(i/u)mangite[V→V]:@₁~%:(i/u)mangite     VerbPostbase5; ! to not have V-ed
-~–kanigh[V→V]:~–kanigh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to be rather V; to be fairly V; to V more and more
-~–kataghagh[V→V]:~–kataghagh                 VerbPostbase5; ! to finally V despite a feeling that it wouldn't happen; to Vat last
-–kestagh[[V→V]:–kestagh                      VerbPostbase5;
-–kusiigh[V→V]:–kusiigh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to casually V; to slowly V
-@₁~flaatagh[V→V]:@₁~flaatagh                 VerbPostbase5; ! to V again; to V more; to V anyway
-~f–laghate[V→V]:~f–laghate                   VerbPostbase5; ! to have already V-ed together; to Vas a group
-@₁laaghigate[V→V]:@₁laaghigate               VerbPostbase5; ! to seldom V; to infrequently V; to not V enough; inadequately V
-@₁laataqu[V→V]:@₁laataqu                     VerbPostbase5; ! to luckily have V-ed well
-–lgusigh[V→V]:–lgusigh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V together with; to help (object) V
-–lgute[V→V]:–lgute                           VerbPostbase5; ! to V together with; to help (object) V
-–lgutke[V→V]:–lgutke                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V together with; to help (object) V
-–llaag[V→V]:–llaag                           VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a crude or clumsy way; crude one V-s
-–llegagh[V→V]:–llegagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V crudely
-@₁lleqe[V→V]:@₁lleqe                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V crudely
-–llghite*[V→V]:–llghite*                     VerbPostbase5; ! to not V
-–llgilliqe[V→V]:–llgilliqe                   VerbPostbase5; ! to experience trouble in V-ing 
-–llgite[V→V]:–llgite                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V poorly
-–llgiite[V→V]:–llgiite                       VerbPostbase5; ! to become a poor V-er
-–llgu[V→V]:–llgu                             VerbPostbase5; ! to V well 
-llug[V→V]:llug                               VerbPostbase5; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
-–llug[V→V]:–llug                             VerbPostbase5; ! to V in an undesirable or bad way; for undesirable or bad one to V
-lliqe[V→V]:lliqe                             VerbPostbase5; ! to have trouble V-ing
-–lliqe[V→V]:–lliqe                           VerbPostbase5; ! to have trouble V-ing
-–lqinagh[V→V]:–lqinagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V for a long time
-–lqiinagh[V→V]:–lqiinagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V for a long time
-–lqusiigh[V→V]:–lqusiigh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little; little one V-s
-@₁lugh[V→V]:@₁lugh                           VerbPostbase5; ! to V angrily
-–mlaagh[V→V]:–mlaagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mraagh[V→V]:–mraagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mzaagh[V→V]:–mzaagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mlegagh[V→V]:–mlegagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mreghagh[V→V]:–mreghagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mzegagh[V→V]:–mzegagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–vlaagh[V→V]:–vlaagh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–vleghagh[V→V]:–vleghagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V a little
-–mrugnite[V→V]:–mrugnite                     VerbPostbase5; ! to seem to be somewhat V 
-–msiigh[V→V]:–msiigh                         VerbPostbase5; ! to V ineffectively or without putting effort into it; to V under conditions of hardship
-–msug[V→V]:–msug                             VerbPostbase5; ! to casually V; to nonchalantly V
-@₁~fna[V→V]:@₁~fna                           VerbPostbase5; ! in order to V; to V 
-@₁~fnagh[V→V]:@₁~fnagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to cause V-ing
-@₁~fnaagh[V→V]:@₁~fnaagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to be going to V eventually
-@₁~fnaanghite[V→V]:@₁~fnaanghite             VerbPostbase5; ! to not Vin the future; won't V
-@₁~fnanigh[V→V]:@₁~fnanigh                   VerbPostbase5; ! to cease V-ing; to stop V-ing; to quit V-ing
-@₁~fnanighqe[V→V]:@₁~fnanighqe               VerbPostbase5; ! to make one cease V-ing
-@₁~fnaqe[V→V]:@₁~fnaqe                       VerbPostbase5; ! to be going to Vin the near future; to try to V
-@₁~fnaqelqusiigh[V→V]:@₁~fnaqelqusiigh       VerbPostbase5; ! to stall or delay at V-ing.
-@₁~fnaqlaatagh[V→V]:@₁~fnaqlaatagh           VerbPostbase5; ! to V again be going to V
-@₁~fnaqngu[V→V]:@₁~fnaqngu                   VerbPostbase5; ! to have to V
-@₁~fnaqute[V→V]:@₁~fnaqute                   VerbPostbase5; ! to try to V
-@₁~fnaqutke[V→V]:@₁~fnaqutke                 VerbPostbase5; ! to try to V (it)
-@₁~f–nasiigh[V→V]:@₁~f–nasiigh               VerbPostbase5; ! to put off V-ing; to stall at V-ing; to V angrily
-@₁~fnatke[V→V]:@₁~fnatke                     VerbPostbase5; ! to use or have (it) in order to V
-@₁~fnayagh[V→V]:@₁~fnayagh                   VerbPostbase5; ! could V; might V; should V; would V
-@₁~f–neghllug[V→V]:@₁~f–neghllug             VerbPostbase5; ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
-@₁~f–neghllugte[V→V]:@₁~f–neghllugte         VerbPostbase5; ! to V wrongly or with difficulty
-@₁~f–neghsigh[V→V]:@₁~f–neghsigh             VerbPostbase5; ! to wait for (it) to V; to wait for (it) to be V or to become V
-@₁~f–neghtu[V→V]:@₁~f–neghtu                 VerbPostbase5; ! to V habitually; to V frequently
-~fnga[V→V]:~fnga                             VerbPostbase5; ! to be in a state of V or of having V-ed
-–ngeltagh[V→V]:–ngeltagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a small way
-–ngertagh[V→V]:–ngertagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a small way
-–ngestagh[V→V]:–ngestagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a small way
-@₁–nghiighte[V→V]:@₁–nghiighte               VerbPostbase5; ! to V to a large extent; to V in a big way
-@₁–nghite**[V→V]:@₁–nghite**                 VerbPostbase5; ! to not V
-@₁~%:(ng₂)igate[V→V]:@₁~%:(ng₂)igate         VerbPostbase5; ! to never V; to not be V-ing at the present time
-%:(ng₁)inagh[V→V]:%:(ng₁)inagh               VerbPostbase5; ! to only V; to go right on V-ing
-~%:(ng₁)u[V→V]:~%:(ng₁)u                     VerbPostbase5; ! to be V-ing; to be V-habitually or as an occupation; while in the process of V-ing
-–ngllagh[V→V]:–ngllagh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to endeavor to induce one to V; to make one V
-@₁~fniite[V→V]:@₁~fniite                     VerbPostbase5; ! to not cause one to V
-@₁~fniigh[V→V]:@₁~fniigh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to hunt by means of V-ing; to carry out the process of V-ing
-@₁–nqegsagh[V→V]:@₁–nqegsagh                 VerbPostbase5; ! to V completely, correctly, thoroughly
-@₁–nqegsi[V→V]:@₁–nqegsi                     VerbPostbase5; ! to be good with respect to V-ing
-@₁–nqegte[V→V]:@₁–nqegte                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V easily; to V readily
-@₁–nqigte[V→V]:@₁–nqigte                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V again
-pag[V→V]:pag                                 VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
-–pag[V→V]:–pag                               VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a big way; to V intensively; to V excessively
-~f(p/v)agaatagh[V→V]:~f(p/v)agaatagh         VerbPostbase5; ! to V repeatedly and hard
-–pagigate[V→V]:–pagigate                     VerbPostbase5; ! to V infrequently; to seldom V 
-–pagite[V→V]:–pagite                         VerbPostbase5; ! for there not to be much V-ness
-pagunghite**[V→V]:pagunghite**               VerbPostbase5; ! to not be sufficiently V
-–pagunghite**[V→V]:–pagunghite**             VerbPostbase5; ! to not be sufficiently V
-panghite[V→V]:panghite                       VerbPostbase5; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
-–panghite[V→V]:–panghite                     VerbPostbase5; ! to insufficiently V; to not V enough
-–pestaagh[V→V]:–pestaagh                     VerbPostbase5; ! to truly V
-–pigesnagh[V→V]:–pigesnagh                   VerbPostbase5; ! to V in vain; to V for naught; to finally V
-–pigte[V→V]:–pigte                           VerbPostbase5; ! to be very V
-~–qagh[V→V]:~–qagh                           VerbPostbase5; ! please V; just V; suddenly V; briefly
-~–qaghaqe[V→V]:~–qaghaqe                     VerbPostbase5; ! to intermittently V; to V now and then
-~–qaghtagh[V→V]:~–qaghtagh                   VerbPostbase5; ! to continuously V with back and forth or up and down movement
-~–qaghte[V→V]:~–qaghte                       VerbPostbase5; ! to suddenly V
-–qaqu[V→V]:–qaqu                             VerbPostbase5; ! to V intermittently
-~–qite[V→V]:~–qite                           VerbPostbase5; ! to encounter V
-–qragh[V→V]:–qragh                           VerbPostbase5; ! to do fancy V-ing; to V a new thing
-–qrug[V→V]:–qrug                             VerbPostbase5; ! for troublesome one to V 
-–qu[V→V]:–qu                                 VerbPostbase5; ! to repeatedly V 
-@₁qugh[V→V]:@₁qugh                           VerbPostbase5; ! to V all things available; to V completely
-@₁~fragh[V→V]:@₁~fragh                       VerbPostbase5; ! to repeatedly or continuously V though perhaps unnecessarily or unsucessfully
-@₁~f–ragkiigh[V→V]:@₁~f–ragkiigh             VerbPostbase5; ! to V quickly
-@₁~f–ragkiighute[V→V]:@₁~f–ragkiighute       VerbPostbase5; ! to V quickly
-@₁~f–rakegte[V→V]:@₁~f–rakegte               VerbPostbase5; ! to V quickly
-@₁~f–rakguugh[V→V]:@₁~f–rakguugh             VerbPostbase5; ! to be fast at V-ing; to learn to V quickly
-saag[V→V]:saag                               VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
-–saag[V→V]:–saag                             VerbPostbase5; ! to V in a strange way; to V weirdly
-sagh[V→V]:sagh                               VerbPostbase5; ! to cause one to V or be V-ed; to endeavor to V
